ko: 쓰레기통 뚜껑 특징: 활성탄 필터 보관함; 핸즈프리 풋페달 호환 가능; 잠금 장치/어린이 안전 잠금; 악취 조절 카트리지 슬롯; 빗물 유입 방지 덮개; 재활용 식별 플랩; 자체 폐쇄형; 저소음 완충 경첩; 비접촉 모션 센서; 환기구; 기타
en: Waste container lid features: Carbon filter compartment; Hands-free foot-pedal compatible; Lockable/child-safe latch; Odor control cartridge slot; Rain guard; Recycling identification flap; Self-closing; Soft-close hinge; Touchless motion sensor; Ventilation ports; Other
pt-PT: Características da tampa do contentor de resíduos: Compartimento do filtro de carbono; Compatível com pedal mãos livres; Fecho bloqueável/à prova de crianças; Compartimento para cartucho de controlo de odores; Proteção contra a chuva; Separador de identificação de reciclagem; Fechamento automático; Dobradiça com fecho suave; Sensor de movimento sem contacto; Portas de ventilação; Outro
ja: 廃棄物容器のふたの特徴: カーボンフィルターコンパートメント; ハンズフリーフットペダル対応; ロック可能/チャイルドセーフティラッチ; 消臭カートリッジスロット; レインガード; リサイクル識別フラップ; 自己閉鎖式; ソフトクローズヒンジ; タッチレスモーションセンサー; 通気ポート; その他
it: Caratteristiche del coperchio della cassa dei rifiuti: Scomparto filtro al carbone; Compatibile con il pedale vivavoce; Chiusura bloccabile/a prova di bambino; Slot per cartuccia di controllo degli odori; protezione antipioggia; Sportello di identificazione del riciclaggio; Autochiudente; Cerniera a chiusura ammortizzata; Sensore Motion senza contatto; Fori di ventilazione; Altro
fr: Caractéristiques du couvercle du conteneur à déchets: Compartiment pour filtre à charbon; Compartiment pour; Verrouillable/sécurité enfant; Emplacement pour cartouche anti-odeurs; Protection contre la pluie; Trappe d’identification du recyclage; Auto-fermant; Charnière à fermeture douce; Capteur de mouvement sans contact; Ports de ventilation; Autre
vi: Tính năng nắp thùng rác: Ngăn chứa bộ lọc than hoạt tính; Tương thích với bàn đạp chân rảnh tay; Chốt khóa an toàn cho trẻ em; Khe cắm hộp lọc khử mùi; Tấm chắn mưa; Nắp nhận dạng đồ tái chế; Tự đóng; Bản lề đóng êm; Cảm biến chuyển động không chạm; Cổng thông gió; Khác
sv: Specifikation för lock till avfallskärl: Kolfilterfack; Kompatibel med fotpedal för handsfree-funktion; Låsbar/barnsäker spärr; Läcka för luktkontrollpatron; Regnskydd; Återvinningsflik för identifiering; Självstängande; Mjukstängande gångjärn; Beröringsfri Motion; Ventilationsport; Annat
pt-BR: Características da tampa da lixeira: Compartimento para filtro de carbono; Compatível com pedal de acionamento sem uso dasm mãos; Trava de segurança para crianças; Compartimento para cartucho de controle de odores; Proteção contra chuva; Aba de identificação para reciclagem; Autofechante; Dobradiça com fechamento suave; Sensor de movimento sem contato; Porta de ventilação; Outro
nl: Kenmerken van afvalcontainerdeksel: Koolstoffiltercompartiment; Compatibel met handsfree voetpedaal; Vergrendelbare/kindveilige sluiting; Sleuf voor geurcontrolepatroon; Regenbescherming; Recycling identificatieklep; Zelfsluitend; Soft-close scharnier; Contactloze bewegingssensor; Ventilatiepoorten; Overig
fi: Jäteastian kannen ominaisuudet: Hiilisuodattimen lokero; Yhteensopiva handsfree-jalkapolkimen kanssa; Lukittava/lapsiturvallinen salpa; Hajunestopatruunan paikka; Sadesuoja; Kierrätyksen tunnisteläppä; Itsesulkeutuva; Pehmeästi sulkeutuva sarana; Kosketusvapaa liikeanturi; Tuuletusportit; Muu
cs: Vlastnosti víka na odpadní nádobu: Přihrádka na uhlíkový filtr; Kompatibilní s pedálovými koši; Uzamykatelné / dětská pojistka; Slot pro kartuši pro neutralizaci zápachu; Ochrana proti dešti; Klapka se štítkem s recyklačními pokyny; Samozavírací; Pant s tlumeným zavíráním; Bezdotykový pohybový senzor; Ventilační otvory; Jiné
zh-TW: 垃圾桶蓋功能: 濾碳隔間; 相容於免手持腳踏板; 可鎖定/兒童安全閂; 除臭卡匣槽; 防雨罩; 回收識別翻蓋; 自動閉合式; 緩閉式鉸鏈; 非接觸式動作感應器; 透氣孔; 其他
hu: Hulladéktartály fedelének jellemzői: Szénszűrő rekesz; Kéz nélküli, lábpedállal kompatibilis; Zárható/gyermekbiztos retesz; Szagtalanítópatron-nyílás; Esővédő; Újrahasznosítási azonosítólap; Önzáró; Halkan záródó zsanér; Érintésmentes mozgásérzékelő; Szellőzőnyílások; Egyéb
hr-HR: Značajke poklopca za spremnike za otpad: Odjeljak za ugljeni filtar; Kompatibilno s pedalom za upotrebu bez ruku; Zaključavanje / sigurnosna dječja zaštita; Utor za uložak protiv neugodnih mirisa; Zaštita od kiše; Preklop za označavanje recikliranja; Samozatvarajuća; Šarka za nježno zatvaranje; Beskontaktni senzor pokreta; Ventilacijski otvori; Ostalo
ro-RO: Caracteristicile capacului coșului de gunoi: Compartimentul filtrului de carbon; Compatibil cu pedală de picior mâini-libere; Încuietoare cu blocare/de siguranță pentru copii; Slot pentru cartușul de control al mirosurilor; Protecție de ploaie; Clapetă de identificare pentru reciclare; Cu închidere automată; Balama cu închidere lentă; Senzor de mișcare fără atingere; Orificii de ventilație; Altele
zh-CN: 垃圾桶盖功能: 活性炭过滤器隔间; 兼容免提脚踏; 可锁定/儿童安全锁; 除味剂插槽; 防雨罩; 回收分类标识盖; 自闭合式; 缓降铰链; 感应式免触开启; 通风口; 其他
sk-SK: Vlastnosti veka odpadkového koša: Priehradka na uhlíkový filter; Kompatibilné s nožným pedálom bez nutnosti použitia rúk; Uzamykateľná/bezpečnostná západka pre deti; Otvor pre náplň na reguláciu zápachu; Ochrana pred dažďom; Štítok s označením recyklácie; Samozatváracie; Pánt s pomalým zatváraním; Bezdotykový snímač pohybu; Vetracie otvory; Iné
nb: Funksjoner på lokket til avfallsbeholder: Karbonfilterrom; Kompatibel med håndfri fotpedal; Låsbar/barnesikker lås; Luktkontrollpatronspor; Regnbeskyttelse; Klaff for identifikasjon av resirkulering; Selvlukkende; Myklukkende hengsel; Berøringsfri bevegelsessensor; Ventilasjonshull; Annet
da: Affaldsbeholders lågfunktioner: Kulfilterrum; Kompatibel med håndfri fodpedal; Låsbar/børnesikker lås; Plads til lugtkontrolpatron; Regnbeskyttelse; Genbrugsmærkningsflap; Selvlukkende; Hængsel til blød lukning; Berøringsfri bevægelsessensor; Ventilationsporte; Andet
el: Χαρακτηριστικά καπακιού δοχείου απορριμμάτων: Θήκη φίλτρου άνθρακα; Συμβατό με πεντάλ χεριών χωρίς χέρια; Κλειδώσιμο/ασφαλές για παιδιά κούμπωμα; Υποδοχή κασέτας ελέγχου οσμών; Προστατευτικό βροχής; Πτερύγιο αναγνώρισης ανακύκλωσης; Αυτοκλειόμενο; Μεντεσές με απαλό κλείσιμο; Αισθητήρας Motion χωρίς επαφή; Θυρίδες εξαερισμού; Άλλο
th: คุณสมบัติของฝาถังขยะ: ช่องใส่ไส้กรองคาร์บอน; รองรับแป้นเหยียบแบบแฮนด์ฟรี; มีระบบล็อก/กลไกป้องกันเด็ก; ช่องใส่ตลับควบคุมกลิ่น; กันฝน; ฝามีป้ายบอกประเภทขยะรีไซเคิล; ปิดตัวเอง; บานพับปิดอย่างนุ่มนวล; เซ็นเซอร์ตรวจจับการเคลื่อนไหวแบบไม่ต้องสัมผัส; ช่องระบายอากาศ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Характеристики на капака на контейнера за отпадъци: Отделение за въглероден филтър; Съвместимо с безконтактен крачен педал; Заключваща се/безопасна за деца закопчалка; Отвор за касета за контрол на миризми; Защита от дъжд; Клапа за идентификация на рециклиране; Самозатварящо се; Панта с плавно затваряне; Безконтактен сензор за движение; Вентилационни отвори; Друго
es: Características de la tapa del contenedor de residuos: Compartimento del filtro de carbón; Compatible con pedal manos libres; Pestillo bloqueable/a prueba de niños; Ranura para cartucho de control de olores; Protector contra la lluvia; Solapa de identificación de reciclaje; Autocierre; Bisagra de cierre suave; Sensor de movimiento sin contacto; Puertos de ventilación; Otros
sl-SI: Značilnosti pokrova zabojnika za odpadke: Predal za ogljikov filter; Združljivo s prostoročnim pedalom; Zaklepanje/zaklepanje pred otroki; Reža za kartušo za nadzor vonjav; Zaščita pred dežjem; Loputa za identifikacijo recikliranja; Samozapiralen; Tečaj z mehkim zapiranjem; Brezkontaktni senzor Motion; Prezračevalne odprtine; Druga
ru: Характеристики крышки мусорного контейнера: Отсек угольного фильтра; Совместимость с педалью для управления без помощи рук; Запираемая/защищенная от детей защелка; Отсек для сменного картриджа с нейтрализатором запаха; Защита от дождя; Клапан для идентификации вторичной переработки; Самозакрывающаяся; Петля с доводчиком; Бесконтактный датчик движения; Вентиляционные отверстия; Другое
de: Eigenschaften des Abfallbehälterdeckels: Kohlefilterfach; Kompatibel mit freihändiger Fußpedalbedienung; Abschließbarer/kindersicherer Verschluss; Steckplatz für Geruchsfilterkartusche; Regenschutz; Recycling-Kennzeichnungsklappe; Selbstschließend; Scharnier mit Soft-Close-Funktion; Berührungsloser Bewegungssensor; Belüftungsöffnungen; Sonstiges
pl: Cechy pokrywy pojemnika na odpady: Komora na filtr węglowy; Kompatybilny z pedałem nożnym (bezdotykowe otwieranie); Zamykane zabezpieczenie przed dziećmi; Miejsce na wkład pochłaniający zapach; Osłona przeciwdeszczowa; Klapa oznaczenia recyklingu; Samozamykające; Zawias z cichym domykiem; Bezdotykowy czujnik ruchu; Otwory wentylacyjne; Inne
tr: Atık kabı kapağı özellikleri: Karbon filtre bölmesi; Eller serbest ayak pedalı uyumlu; Kilitlenebilir/çocuk güvenlikli mandal; Koku kontrol kartuşu yuvası; Yağmur koruması; Geri dönüşüm işaret kapağı; Kendinden kapanan; Yumuşak kapanan menteşesi; Temassız hareket sensörü; Havalandırma delikleri; Diğer
lt-LT: Atliekų konteinerio dangčio savybės: Anglies filtro skyrius; Suderinamas su laisvų rankų kojiniu pedalu; Užrakinamas / vaikams saugus užraktas; Kvapų kontrolės kasetės anga; Apsauga nuo lietaus; Perdirbimo identifikavimo atvartas; Savaime užsidarantis; Švelnaus uždarymo vyris; Bekontaktis judesio jutiklis; Ventiliacijos anga; Kita